Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 3. Capital Requirements, Stock, Notes and Debentures

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d Banks and Financial Institutions §§ 241 to 309.

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 48 to 62.

§ 13-2-301.
Requirements as to capital.

The capital stock of each bank organized under this act shall be subscribed for as fully paid stock. No bank shall organize with a capital stock less than five million dollars ($5,000,000.00).

No bank shall commence business until the full amount of its authorized capital is subscribed and all capital stock is fully paid in. No bank may organize without a paid up surplus fund of at least twenty percent (20%) of its legally authorized capital stock, and undivided profits in sufficient amount for the expense of operation the first year as determined by the state banking commissioner.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 4; 1927, ch. 62, § 1; 1931, ch. 49, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 10-104; C.S. 1945, § 35-105; Laws 1949, ch. 127, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-48; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017,
in (a) substituted “five million dollars” ($5,000,000.00)
for “five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00)”.

Cross references. —

As to investment securities, see chapter 8 of title 34.1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a), see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

§ 13-2-302.
Issue of stock.

A bank shall not issue any share of stock until the par value of the share has been actually paid in cash.

Pursuant to appropriate authority granted in its articles of incorporation, a bank may issue any type of capital stock, including nonvoting shares, authorized under title 17 of the Wyoming statutes. Consistent with subsection (c) of this section, the articles of incorporation of a bank may specify any form of shareholder voting rights.

If the articles of incorporation of a bank provide shareholder voting rights that are different than those provided under W.S.

13-2-307

, 13-2-308(a), 13-2-309(a), 13-2-402(e), 13-4-101(a) or 13-4-701(b) or (d), the articles of incorporation of the bank shall control, subject to any approval of the commissioner required under those sections.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 10-108; C.S. 1945, § 35-109; W.S. 1957, § 13-58; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 2019 ch. 30, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a), and added (b) and (c).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Applicability to banking corporation of constitutional or statutory provision precluding issuance of corporate stock in consideration of promissory note, 78 ALR2d 834.

§ 13-2-303.
Increase or reduction of capital stock.

Any bank may increase or reduce the capital stock of the bank after receiving the written approval of the state banking commissioner and by the vote of the shareholders owning two-thirds (2/3) of the stock in the bank at a stockholders’ meeting called for that purpose.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 10-109; C.S. 1945, § 35-110; W.S. 1957, § 13-59; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Reduction of capital stock in distribution of capital assets, 35 ALR2d 1149.

§ 13-2-304.
Transfer of stock and other ownership interests.

The shares of stock of banks are personal property and shall be transferred on the books of the bank in such manner as the bylaws may provide. A transfer of stock in a bank is invalid until any impairment of its capital stock has been restored.

Transfers of voting ownership interests of a bank or of a bank holding company shall be reported to the commissioner not less than ten (10) days prior to being made if the transfer:

Equals or exceeds ten percent (10%) of the bank’s or the bank holding company’s voting ownership interests; or

Is made to a person owning or controlling ten percent (10%) or more and less than eighty percent (80%) of the bank’s or the bank holding company’s voting ownership interests.

The state banking commissioner may disapprove any transfer of stock required to be reported if he finds that the transferee:

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 115, § 3.

Has been convicted of a felony; or

Has been removed from a position as director, officer or employee of a bank or other financial institution pursuant to an order of the state banking commissioner or appropriate federal regulatory authority.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 13; R.S. 1931, § 10-113; C.S. 1945, § 35-114; W.S. 1957, § 13-60; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1992, ch. 46, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, §§ 1, 3; 2001, ch. 73, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights, duties and liability in connection with transfer of stock of decedent, 7 ALR2d 1240.

Remedy for refusal of corporation or its agent to register or effectuate transfer of stock, 22 ALR2d 12.

Validity of restrictions on alienation or transfer of stock, 61 ALR2d 1318.

Right or duty of bank to refuse, on ground of knowledge or suspicion of conflicting rights of registered holder or third person, to transfer stock on books to one who presents properly indorsed certificate, 75 ALR2d 746.

§ 13-2-305.
Purchase or acceptance of own capital stock.

A bank shall not accept as collateral or purchase its own capital stock unless the taking of the collateral or purchase is necessary to prevent loss upon a debt previously contracted in good faith. The stock shall be sold by the bank within six (6) months from the date it was received as collateral or acquired by purchase unless the debt is paid in full.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 14; R.S. 1931, § 10-114; C.S. 1945, § 35-115; W.S. 1957, § 13-61; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights of creditors of corporation with respect to its purchase or acquisition of own stock, 47 ALR2d 758.

§ 13-2-306.
Stock register; inspection.

A bank shall keep a record of shareholders that is open for inspection during business hours to officers, directors and shareholders of the bank. As used in this section, “record of shareholders” means as defined in W.S. 17-16-140(a)(xlix).

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 15; R.S. 1931, § 10-115; C.S. 1945, § 35-116; W.S. 1957, § 13-62; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 2019 ch. 30, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “record of shareholders” for “stock register which” following “A bank shall keep a,” “shareholders” for “stockholders” preceding “of the bank,” and “As used in this section, ‘record of shareholders’ means as defined in W.S. 17-16-140(a)(xlix)” for “The register shall contain the name, residence and number of shares of each stockholder and all transfers of stock, stating the time made, the number of shares and to whom transferred.”

Cross references. —

As to penalty for refusing to allow inspection, see §

13-10-109

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Purposes for which stockholder may exercise right to examine corporate books and records, 15 ALR2d 11.

§ 13-2-307.
Voting by shareholders generally; balloting for directors.

Except as otherwise provided by W.S.

13-2-302

, each share entitles the owner to one (1) vote on all elections of directors and all other questions submitted at meetings of shareholders. Shareholders may vote by proxies executed in writing but no officer, clerk, teller or bookkeeper of the bank shall act as proxy. The presence in person or by proxy of the owners of at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the issued and outstanding capital stock at any meeting of stockholders constitutes a quorum. No shareholder whose liability to the bank is past due and unpaid shall be allowed to vote.

In balloting for directors each qualified shareholder may vote the number of shares owned by him for as many directors as are to be elected or may cumulate his votes by giving one (1) candidate the number of votes equal to the number of directors to be elected multiplied by the number of his shares and he may distribute his votes cumulatively on the same principle among any number of candidates. The persons having the highest number of votes shall be declared elected as the board of directors for the ensuing corporate year.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 18; 1929, ch. 55, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 10-118; C.S. 1945, § 35-119; Laws 1947, ch. 23, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-63; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 2019 ch. 30, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “Except as otherwise provided by W.S.

13-2-302

, each” for “Each” at the beginning.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction, application and effect of constitutional provisions or statutes relating to cumulative voting of stock for bank directors, 43 ALR2d 1322.

§ 13-2-308.
Preferred stock.

A bank may issue one (1) or more classes of preferred stock upon the approval of two-thirds (2/3) of the stockholders pursuant to this section and the approval of the state banking commissioner.

Copies of the directors’ and stockholders’ minutes approving the issuance bearing the approval of the state banking commissioner shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state and treated as an amendment to the articles of incorporation.

At a board of directors’ meeting called on not less than one (1) days notice, the directors may adopt a resolution calling for the issuance of preferred shares. The directors shall then call a meeting of the stockholders of the corporation, giving not less than five (5) days notice for the purpose of stockholder approval.

The voting rights and manner of retirement of preferred shares shall be as adopted in the resolution of the stockholders authorizing their issuance subject to the provisions of the articles of incorporation and the approval of the state banking commissioner.

The holders of the preferred stock of the highest class shall be entitled to cumulative dividends of up to six percent (6%) per year before dividends are paid on any other stock. The holders of preferred stock of subsequent classes shall next be entitled to cumulative dividends of up to six percent (6%) in order of preference before dividends are paid to the holders of common stock. In any liquidation no payment shall be made to the holders of common stock until the holders of preferred stock have been paid the full par value of their stock and accumulated dividends in order of preference.

The preferred stock and holders of preferred stock are not liable for assessments to restore impairment of capital or for any liability imposed by law on common stock or the holders of common stock.

No issue of preferred stock is valid until the entire par value of the shares has been paid in cash or until arrangements satisfactory to the state banking commissioner have been made for payment.

The par value of preferred stock shall be included in any determination of required capital under this act.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 7, §§ 1 to 6; 1937, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-901 to 35-907; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-67 to 13-73; Laws 1977, ch. 45, § 4; ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (h), see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 7, § 9, repealed all laws or parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of cancellation of accrued dividends on preferred bank stock, 8 ALR2d 893.

§ 13-2-309.
Issuance of capital notes or debentures; generally.

A bank may issue, sell or pledge its capital notes or debentures if the bank has first obtained the written or voting approval of the shareholders holding a majority of the shares of the bank and the written approval of the state banking commissioner.

The board of directors shall determine the terms of its capital notes or debentures subject to the provisions of W.S.

13-2-311

and subsection (c) of this section.

The amount of outstanding capital notes or debentures of any bank shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the amount of the capital stock and surplus fund of the bank at the date of issue. The periods of maturities with respect to any issue shall not exceed twenty-five (25) years as prescribed by the state banking commissioner. Capital notes and debentures shall be subject to a schedule of prepayments or to an appropriate sinking fund for the amortization of the indebtedness.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 127, §§ 1, 3; W.S. 1957, § 30-54; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-2-310.
Issuance of capital notes or debentures; approval by state banking commissioner.

The state banking commissioner may approve the issue of capital notes or debentures by any bank. Applications for approval shall be in writing and contain information which he requests including a full explanation of the need for and proposed use of the funds. The state banking commissioner shall consider whether the issuance would constitute sound banking practice and would be in the best interests of the public, depositors, creditors and stockholders of the bank.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 127, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 30-55; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-2-311.
Capital notes or debentures; provisions to be stated.

The following provisions shall be stated in the capital notes or debentures:

That the notes or debentures are an unsecured indebtedness of the bank and subordinate to the claims of creditors and depositors;

In the event of liquidation of the bank all depositors and creditors are entitled to be paid in full with interest provided by law prior to payment on the notes or debentures;

No payment will be made on the principal of the notes or debentures unless following the payment the aggregate of the capital, surplus and undivided profits of the bank is at least equal to the amount of the capital, surplus and undivided profits at the date of issue unless otherwise authorized by the state banking commissioner.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 127, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 30-56; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1983, ch. 152, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 13-2-312.
Capital notes or debentures; conversion into common or preferred stock.

Capital notes and debentures may be converted into shares of common or preferred stock in accordance with the provisions of the capital notes or debentures. If capital notes or debentures are converted the president or vice-president shall subscribe and verify triplicate originals of a certificate stating the amount of conversion and other information as required by the state banking commissioner. The certificates shall be delivered to and approved by the state banking commissioner who shall file one (1) of the certificates in his office, one (1) in the office of the secretary of state and return one (1) to the subscribing officer of the bank.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 127, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 30-57; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-2-313.
Capital notes or debentures; no assessment or liability.

Capital notes, debentures and the holders thereof are not subject to any assessment nor are holders of the notes or debentures liable for any debts or contracts of the bank.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 127, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 30-58; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

§ 13-2-314.
Capital notes or debentures; proceeds not part of capital or surplus.

The proceeds from the sale of capital notes or debentures shall not be considered a portion of the capital or surplus of the issuing bank nor treated as meeting any requirements, restrictions or conditions relating to the capital or surplus of a bank.

The proceeds from the sale of notes or debentures issued may not be used to reduce or retire outstanding capital stock or surplus.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 127, §§ 7, 8; W.S. 1957, § 30-59; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.